District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
44 act may be cited as the “Universal Out of School Time Amendment Act of 2025”.
1

45 Sec. 2. The Office of Out of School Time Grants and Youth Outcomes Establishment Act
46 of 2016, effective April 7, 2017 (D.C. Law 21-261; D.C. Official Code § 2-1555.01 et seq.) is
47 amended as follows:
48 (a) Section 2(a) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1555.01(a)) is amended as follows:
49 (1) New paragraphs (1A) (2A), (2B), (2C), (2D), (6A), (6B), and (6C) are added
50 to read as follows:
51 “(1A) “Child with a disability” shall have the same meaning as provided in
52 section 602(3) of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, approved April 13, 1970, (84
53 Stat. 175; 20 U.S.C. § 1401(3)).
54 “(2A) “Community-based organization” or “CBO” means an out-of-school-time
55 service provider that is a nonprofit entity, faith-based organization, or other entity, excluding the
56 District or a Local Education Agency, that provides out-of-school time programming to District
57 youth.
58 “(2B) “Deduplicated” means the elimination of data that double counts enrollment
59 or capacity of an out-of-school-time program across more than one session such that the total
60 number of youth an out-of-school-time service provider serves reflects their true capacity and
61 enrollment at any one time.
62 “(2C) “Equitable access” means a strategic approach to increasing District-wide
63 availability of out-of-school-time program seats that prioritize at-risk youth and closing gaps of
64 geographic distribution of programming relative to youth residency and school enrollment
65 identified by the Commission’s needs assessment and strategic plan issued pursuant to section 8
66 of this act.
2

67 “(2D) “Low-income" means having a household income that is less than 60% of
68 the area median family income for the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area according to the
69 statistics of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
70 “(6A) “Out-of-school-time service provider” means a youth development program
71 provider, including the District, that is publicly funded, in-part or in-whole, to facilitate one or
72 more out-of-school programs. A single organization, LEA, or entity may operate multiple out-of-
73 school-time programs in different locations.
74 “(6B) “Program session” means an out-of-school-time program that is provided
75 on a continuous basis, and that a youth may enroll in for a discrete number of weeks, either
76 before school, after school, or during summer break. An out-of-school-time service provider may
77 offer more than one program session consecutively or at more than one location.
78 “(6C) “Universal access” means a high-quality out-of-school-time program seat is
79 available to all youth enrolled in a Local Education Agency, relative to demand, and the program
80 seat is available on a free or affordable sliding-scale basis relative to household income.”.
81 (2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “Agency” means” and
82 inserting the phrase “Agency” or “LEA” means” in its place.
83 (3) Paragraph (7) is amended to read as follows:
84 “(7) "Youth" means an individual of 21 years of age or less who is enrolled in a
85 District primary or secondary school of a Local Education Agency, or an individual of 22 years
86 of age or less who is enrolled in special education services from an LEA.
3

87 (4) Paragraph (9) is amended by striking the phrase “educational, and
88 recreational” and inserting the phrase “educational, enrichment, or recreational” in its place.
89 (b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 2-1555.02) is amended as follows:
90 (1) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
91 “(b) The mission of the Office is to facilitate universal access to out-of-school-time
92 programs by:
93 “(1) Coordinating, promoting, and improving out-of-school-time program
94 offerings across out-of-school-time service providers;
95 “(2) Administering out-of-school-time funding pursuant to section 5 of this act;
96 “(3) Conducting and publicly publishing out-of-school-time program analysis
97 pursuant to section 9 of this act; and
98 “(4) Supporting out-of-school-time service providers in scaling up programming
99 to close gaps in out-of-school-time program seat capacity and geographic location consistent
100 with the strategic plan recommendations of the Commission.”.
101 (2) A new subsection (d) is added to read as follows
102 “(d) The Office shall spend not more than 7% of its annual budget appropriations
103 on Office overhead.”.
104 (c) Section 4(a) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1555.03(a)) is amended as follows:
105 (1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “Guide” and inserting the
106 phrase “Facilitate” in its place.
4

107 (2) Paragraph (3) is amended to read as follows:
108 “(3)(A) Gather, analyze, and publish data from out-of-school-time service
109 providers funded in part or in whole by the District or by federal funds administered through the
110 District pursuant to section 9 of this act;
111 “(B) Utilize data to implement programmatic and funding improvements
112 that increase equitable access to high-quality, evidence-based out-of-school-time programs by
113 not less than a 10% year-over-year growth in seat capacity;”.
114 (3) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the phrase “,
115 including by widely promoting program offerings, educating stakeholders about the benefits of
116 out-of-school-time programming, and assisting with program enrollment;” in its place.
117 (4) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “on out-of-school-time” and
118 inserting the phrase “on universal access to out-of-school-time” in its place.
119 (5) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “development and other” and
120 inserting the phrase “development, navigating and managing organizational growth to grow seat
121 capacity and programmatic accessibility, and other” in its place.
122 (6) A new paragraph (7A) is added to read as follows:
123 “(7A) Provide in-house technical assistance to:
124 “(A) Out-of-school-time-service providers on improving program
125 accessibility and meeting local and federal guidelines for serving children with a disability;
126 “(B) Staff of out-of-school-time-service providers on supporting physical,
127 emotional, and behavioral needs of children with a disability;
5

128 “(C) Parents of a child with a disability on finding out-of-school-time
129 service providers able to meet the unique needs of their child.”.
130 (7) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the phrase
131 “on universal access to out-of-school-time programs;” in its place.
132 (8) Paragraph (9) is amended to read as follows:
133 “(9)(A) In coordination with the Commission, lead collaboration, coordination,
134 and problem-solving across District agencies, LEAs, and CBO out-of-school-time service
135 providers to strengthen program offerings, funding, accessibility, and outcomes and build a
136 system that promotes and achieves universal access to out-of-school-time programming in
137 accordance with the strategic plan;
138 “(B) The Office shall engage the following District agencies to ensure a
139 whole-of-government approach to collaboration, coordination, and problem-solving related to
140 youth development:
141 “(i) The Office and Commission of Out of School Time Grants and
142 Youth Outcomes;
143 “(ii) The Office of the Deputy Mayor for Education, including
144 representation from the Office for Students in the Care of DC;
145 “(iii) The Office of the State Superintendent of Education;
146 “(iv) District of Columbia Public Schools;
147 “(v) District of Columbia Public Charter School Board;
148 “(vi) The Department of Parks and Recreation;
6

149 “(vii) The Department of Employment Services;
150 “(viii) The Department of Behavioral Health;
151 “(ix) The Department of Human Services;
152 “(x) Child and Family Services Agency;
153 “(xi) The Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services;
154 “(xii) The Office of the Attorney General;
155 “(xiii) The Office of Neighborhood Safety and Engagement;
156 “(xiv) The Office of the Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and
157 Justice, including representation from the Safe Passage program;
158 "(xv) The Office of Disability Rights;
159 “(xvi) District of Columbia Public Library; and
160 “(xvii) The Council;”.
161 (9) Paragraph 10 is amended to read as follows:
162 “(10)(A) Develop, in collaboration with the Commission, plans for measuring and
163 assessing the quality of out-of-school-time programs;
164 “(B) Create and implement a plan to improve the quality, accessibility,
165 and inclusivity of out-of-school-time programs funded in part or in whole by the District; and”.
166 (10) A new paragraph (11) is added to read as follows:
7

167 “(11)(A) Obtain, disperse, and administer funding for out-of-school-time
168 programs consistent with the strategic plan’s requirement to prioritize equitable access in scaling
169 up programming to achieve universal access to out-of-school-time programs by 2036;
170 “(B) Not less than 90% of Office grant funds shall be awarded to CBOs
171 that provide or coordinate out-of-school-time programs.”.
172 (d) Section 5 (D.C. Official Code § 2-1555.04) is amended as follows:
173 (1) Subsection (b)(3) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “,
174 including training to enable out-of-school-time service providers and staff to accommodate the
175 needs of a child with a disability.” in its place.
176 (2) A new subsection (b-1) is added to read as follows:
177 “(b-1) The Office shall award not less than 90% of competitive grants authorized under
178 subsection (b) of this section to CBOs that provide or coordinate out-of-school-time programs.”.
179 (3) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “and program quality.” and
180 inserting the phrase “program quality, and achieving an annual 10% year-over-year growth of
181 out-of-school-time program seats until the Commission determines the District has achieved
182 universal access.” in its place.
183 (4) A new subsection (e1) is added to read as follows:
184 “(e-1)(1) The Office shall provide public notice of not less than 4 months before any
185 revisions take effect to grant application processes, grant award amounts, or grantee program
186 offering requirements.
8

187 “(2) The Office shall consult the Commission, out-of-school-time service
188 providers, and other public stakeholders to solicit feedback in advance of posting intended grant
189 revisions pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection.”.
190 (5) Subsection (g) is amended to read as follows:
191 “(g) In addition to the reporting requirements in § 1-328.16, on or before January 1 of
192 each year, the Office shall submit to the Council and make publicly available on its website
193 reports detailing grant awards and activity required pursuant to the requirements of section 9 of
194 this subchapter.”
195 (e) Section 6 (D.C. Official Code § 2-1555.05) is amended as follows:
196 (1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
197 “(a) There is established a Commission on Out of School Time Grants and Youth
198 Outcomes to develop a District-wide strategic plan for creating and funding universal access to
199 out-of-school-time programs, with a focus to geographic and socioeconomic equity in program
200 capacity expansion.”.
201 (2) Subsection (b) is amended by adding a new paragraph (7A) to read as follows:
202 “(7A) The Attorney General of the District of Columbia.”.
203 (f) Section 7(b) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1555.06(b)) is amended as follows:
204 (1) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
205 “At least 2 members are consumers of out-of-school-time programs in the
206 District;”.
207 (2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon in
208 its place.
9

209 (3) A new paragraph (3) is added to read as follows:
210 “(3) At least 2 members are parents or guardians of a youth enrolled in an out-of-
211 school-time program in the District; and”.
212 (3) A new paragraph (4) is added to read as follows:
213 “(4) At least one member who is a subject matter expert in advocacy or data
214 analysis for out-of-school-time programs.”.
215 (g) Section 8(a) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1555.07(a)) is amended as follows:
216 (1) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
217 “(1) Set the goals and scope of a biennial, community-wide needs assessment,
218 which the Office shall conduct, to:
219 “(A) Assess the number of program seats needed to guarantee universal
220 access to out-of-school-time programs relative to demand for enrollment in programming;
221 “(B) Identify programmatic growth needs and trends, and benchmark city-
222 wide progress toward achieving universal access to out-of-school-time programs, relative to
223 demand, including assessments of geographic, demographic, socioeconomic, and program
224 offering metrics;
225 “(C) Identify met and unmet programmatic capacity, training, and quality
226 improvement needs of youth identified as:
227 “(i) At-risk;
228 “(ii) A child with a disability;
10

229 “(iii) English language learners;
230 “(iv) Justice system-involved; or
231 “(v) Low-income;
232 “(D) Determine barriers to program participation, including:
233 “(i) Program costs and what families determine make a program
234 affordable for households at different income levels of different family sizes;
235 “(ii) Transportation access, modes, and distance;
236 “(iii) Ability of programs to meet and staff the needs of children
237 with a disability; or
238 “(iv) Alignment with youth-identified interests and preferences in
239 program content or offerings; and
240 “(E) Identify professional development and organizational growth
241 management support needs for out-of-school-time service providers to enable them to
242 successfully scale up operations to achieve universal access to programming.”.
243 (2) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
244 “(1A)(A) The Commission shall collaborate with the Mayor’s Office of Racial
245 Equity to ensure the community-wide needs assessment scope of work is developed with a racial
246 equity lens.
11

247 “(B) The needs assessment shall be reviewed by the Mayor’s Office of
248 Racial Equity prior to finalization to identify and remedy deficiencies in findings or data analysis
249 from a racial equity perspective.
250 “(C) The Office shall facilitate the collaboration required of subparagraphs
251 (B) and (C) of this paragraph.”.
252 (3) A new paragraph (1B) is added to read as follows:
253 “(1B) At such time as the Commission determines the District has added
254 sufficient out-of-school-time program seat capacity to meet the participation demands and
255 specialized program content needs of all youth enrolled in an LEA, the Commission shall issue a
256 written determination to the Mayor and the Council demonstrating success achieving universal
257 access and providing recommendations on steps the District must take to maintain, or further
258 improve, programmatic enrollment, quality, and youth interest in service provider offerings.
259 (4) A new paragraph (2A) is added to read as follows:
260 “(2A) Beginning January 1, 2027, the strategic plan shall require the District to
261 implement a system for achieving universal access to out-of-school-time programs by 2036. The
262 Commission shall work with the Mayor’s Office of Racial Equity to apply a racial equity lens to
263 the plan and the Commission shall solicit ongoing youth input to develop the strategic plan,
264 taking into account and instructing the Office on steps to take to address:
265 “(A) District government agency, LEA, and CBO service provider
266 collaborations needed to achieve at least a 10% year-over-year expansion in seat capacity until
267 the Commission determines the District has achieved universal access pursuant to paragraph
268 (1B) of this subsection, or until the Commission issues a written determination demonstrating
12

269 that a 10% growth rate is no longer needed or feasible to meet remaining demand for out-of-
270 school-time programming;
271 “(B) Closing existing service and enrollment gaps in out-of-school-time
272 programs with a focus on equitable access in expanding OST programming;
273 “(C) Program capacity expansion that prioritizes creating new seats for
274 youth who are:
275 “(i) Designated at-risk;
276 “(ii) Designated as a child with a disability;
277 “(iii) English language learners;
278 “(iv) Justice system involved; or
279 “(v) Low-income;
280 “(D) Funding needs, gaps, targets, and opportunities necessary to achieve
281 universal access to programming;
282 “(E) Removing barriers to program participation, including:
283 “(i) Program participation and supply costs to families;
284 “(ii) Geographic convenience;
285 “(iii) Transportation access and costs;
286 “(iv) Quality;
287 “(v) Accessibility of programs for children with a disability;
13

288 “(vi) Public awareness of programs and registration hurdles; and
289 “(vii) Youth interest and priorities in program offerings;
290 “(F) Improving the quality of programs, including ways the Office can
291 support the capacity building and professional development needs of out-of-school-time service
292 providers;
293 “(G) Office personnel growth and skills needed to improve the Office’s
294 efficiency, external communication, grant administration, and data tracking and sharing as out-
295 of-school-time programming scales up; and
296 “(H) Facilitating mutually beneficial partnerships across out-of-school-
297 time service providers in order to maximize quality, quantity, accessibility, and availability of
298 programming for all youth.”.
299 (h) Section 9 (D.C. Official Code § 2-1555.08) is amended as follows:
300 (1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
301 “(a) Not later than January 1, 2026, the Office, in collaboration with the Commission,
302 shall coordinate with the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Office of the State
303 Superintendent of Education, LEAs, and Department of Employment Services to:
304 “(1) Align out-of-school-time funding priorities, promotion strategies, and agency
305 capacity building needs to increase the number of youth served by out-of-school-time programs
306 and improve equitable access to program opportunities pursuant to priorities identified by the
307 Commission’s strategic plan;
14

308 “(2) Streamline and standardize, where appropriate, the grant application, grant
309 payments, and grant reporting processes for out-of-school time service providers seeking funding
310 from the District;
311 “(3) Share, standardize, and publish deduplicated data pursuant to subsection (c)
312 of this section to improve the District’s per-youth tracking of out-of-school-time program
313 capacity and enrollment;
314 “(4) Make public on the Office’s website all copies of federally mandated grant
315 reports related to 21st Century Community Learning Center grants, Workforce Innovation and
316 Opportunity Act (WIOA) youth funding, and other federal sources of out-of-school-time
317 funding; and
318 “(5)(A) Create, collect, and make public on the Office’s website summaries of
319 annual youth evaluations of out-of-school-time programs;
320 “(B) Evaluations may aggregate responses per-program offering per-
321 service provider to protect the anonymity of respondents; and
322 “(C) The Office shall publish anonymized responses to the District’s
323 annual Out-of-School-Time Survey of Academic and Youth Outcomes (DC OST SAYO-Y)
324 collected as of 2017.”.
325 (2) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
326 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
327 (i) Strike the phrase “Within 36 months of April 17, 2017, the
328 Commission” and insert the phrase “Not later than January 1, 2027, the Office, in coordination
329 with the Commission,” in its place.
15

330 (ii) Strike the phrase “the feasibility of expanding” and insert the
331 phrase “steps the Office and Commission shall take to expand” in its place.
332 (iii) Strike the phrase “Department of Employment Services,”.
333 (B) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
334 “(2) The Office shall publicize its recommendations, the rationale for the
335 recommendations, and the concrete steps it shall take, in partnership with the Commission, to
336 increase coordination.”.
337 (3) A new subsection (c) is added to read as follows:
338 “(c)(1) To facilitate the accurate tracking of progress toward universal access of out-of-
339 school-time programs, the Office shall publish on its website an annual report on all program
340 seats, funded in part or in whole through the District or federal funding sources, detailing:
341 “(A) Out-of-school-time funding source or sources and amount allocated
342 or awarded per:
343 “(i) Out-of-school-time service provider;
344 “(ii) Program session per location, if applicable; and
345 “(iii) Per grade-range of program per location, if the same or
346 substantially similar program is offered for different aged youth during simultaneous sessions;
347 “(B) Specific services provided to youth including:
348 “(i) Out-of-school-time service provider name or name of
349 subgrantee providing services,
350 “(ii) Programmatic content and youth development goals;
351 “(iii) Location or locations of programs offered;
352 “(iv) Youth-to-staff ratio;
16

353 “(v) Transportation services, if any; and
354 “(vi) How the program or service provider meets the needs of at-
355 risk youth, children with disabilities, English language learners, or justice involved youth;
356 “(C) Demographic profile of youth served per program session, per
357 location, if applicable, aggregating total youth served by:
358 “(i) Grade range;
359 “(ii) Home Ward;
360 “(iii) School Ward;
361 “(iv) Designation as:
362 “(I) At-risk;
363 “(II) Child with a disability; or
364 “(III) Justice involved;
365 “(v) Race and ethnic identity; and
366 “(vi) Gender or gender identity;
367 “(D) Deduplicated per program session capacity, enrollment, and
368 attendance numbers;
369 “(E) Annual program seat capacity and enrollment numbers per out-of-
370 school-time service provider, deduplicated to count the total number of youth served by provider
371 per program location, if provider operates in multiple program locations;
372 “(F) Length of program, including:
373 “(i) Number of weeks program session operates;
374 “(ii) Days and hours per week program operates per session; and
17

375 “(iii) Number of sessions offered annually per location and grade
376 level served, if multiple sessions are simultaneously offered; and
377 “(G) Program operating expenses, program overhead or indirect cost
378 expenses, and program participation or supply costs charged to families, if any.
379 “(2) The Mayor shall make available to the Office data sets from subordinate
380 agencies necessary to comply with the reporting requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection.
381 The Office may initiate data sharing agreements to facilitate reporting requirements.”.
382 (4) A new subsection (d) is added to read as follows:
383 “(d)(1) The Office shall publish on its website an annual report summarizing anonymized
384 grant requests that did not receive Office funding detailing per applicant:
385 “(A) The funding amount requested;
386 “(B) The anticipated number of youth served, per grade range, if funded;
387 “(C) The Ward location or locations of programming would be offered;
388 “(D) The anticipated days and hours per week of programming, if funded;
389 “(E) A summary of program offerings or services including how the
390 program planned to meet the needs of at-risk youth, children with a disability, English language
391 learners, or justice involved youth;
392 “(F) Program enrollment or supply costs charged to families, if any;
393 “(G) Overall grant application score awarded by review committee; and
394 “(H) Other programming and funding metrics determined by the Office
395 and reflective of data requests made by the Commission.
396 “(2) The Office shall publish the names and District government or organizational
397 affiliation, if any, of the members of the grant review committee.
18

398 “(3) The report shall include a summary of recommendations of how prospective
399 grantees can strengthen their application or program services to increase their likelihood of
400 receiving future funding”.
401 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
402 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
403 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
404 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
405 Sec. 4. Effective date.
406 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
407 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
408 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
409 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
410 Columbia Register.
19